src/morphology/stemparts/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_HALAJAA

0:a   V_BACK_AINF    ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VIPAJAA

0:a   V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:a     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:a     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:a     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HELÄJÄÄ

0:ä   V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0     V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_RAIKAA

0     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_ÄHKÄÄ

0     V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0     V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0     V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0     V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TUIKKAA

0:ka     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ka     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ka     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ka     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ka     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;


LEXICON V_OLLA

0:oll    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:oll    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:ole    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:on V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL3]:ovat V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
0:ol    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ol    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ol    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:lie   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ol   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ol   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:ol  V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ol   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;
0:ole   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=MAISILLA]:olemaisilla             V_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:olematta                V_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:olemalla                V_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:olemasta                V_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:olemaan                 V_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:olemassa                V_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=M][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:oleman                  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][CLIT=S]:oles                     # ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG1][STYLE=DIALECT]:oisin         V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECT]:oisit         V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG3][STYLE=DIALECT]:ois           V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL1][STYLE=DIALECT]:oisimme       V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL2][STYLE=DIALECT]:oisitte       V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL3][STYLE=DIALECT]:oisivat       V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT]:ol                           A_PARANNELTU ;
[VOICE=ACT][PCP=AGENT]:olem                        A_AALTOILEVA ;
[VOICE=ACT][PCP=NEG]:olemat                        A_VIATON ;
[VOICE=ACT][PCP=VA][DRV=INEN]:olevai               A_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
[VOICE=ACT][PCP=VA]:olev                          A_AALTOILEVA ;
[DRV=MINEN]:olemi                          N_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
[DRV=JA]:olij                              N_SOITTAJA ;
[VOICE=ACT][PCP=NUT]:oll                           A_KULUNUT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:lienen                       V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:lienet                       V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:lienee                       V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:lie                       V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:lienemme                     V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:lienette                     V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:lienevät                     V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:liene                     V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:lie                       V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON V_EI

[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG1]:en             V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG1][CLIT=KA]:enkä  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG2]:et             V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG2][CLIT=KA]:etkä  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG3]:ei             V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG3][CLIT=KA]:eikä  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL1]:emme           V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL1][CLIT=KA]:emmekä    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL2]:ette           V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL2][CLIT=KA]:ettekä    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL3]:eivät          V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL3][CLIT=KA]:eivätkä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2]:älä     V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT/Neg    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][CLIT=KA]:äläkä  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG3]:älköön          V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG3][CLIT=KA]:älköönkä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL1]:älkäämme    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL1][CLIT=KA]:älkäämmekä V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2]:älkää   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2][CLIT=KA]:älkääkä    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL3]:älkööt  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
[SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL3][CLIT=KA]:älköötkä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
